Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 6 Elevators, Dumbwaiters, Escalators, Manlifts, and Moving Walks

Administrative rules and regulations.

Escalators and elevators, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations for the State of Georgia, Rules of Safety Fire Commissioner, Chapter 120-3-25.

8-2-100.
Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

“Alteration” means any change or addition to the equipment other than ordinary repairs or replacements.

“Commissioner” means the Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Dumbwaiter” means a hoisting and lowering mechanism which is equipped with a car which moves in guides in a substantially vertical direction, the floor area of which does not exceed nine square feet, the total inside height of which, whether or not provided with fixed or removable shelves, does not exceed four feet, the capacity of which does not exceed 500 pounds, and the use of which is exclusively for carrying materials. Such term includes a power dumbwaiter and a hand dumbwaiter.

“Elevator” means a hoisting and lowering mechanism designed to carry passengers or authorized personnel and equipped with a car which moves in fixed guides and serves two or more fixed landings.

Except as specifically provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 8-2-102, “elevator” also means a freight elevator, gravity elevator, hand elevator, inclined elevator, multideck elevator, observation elevator, passenger elevator, power elevator, electric elevator, hydraulic elevator, direct-plunger hydraulic elevator, electrohydraulic elevator, maintained pressure hydraulic elevator, roped-hydraulic elevator, private residence elevator, and sidewalk elevator.

“Enforcement authority” means the Commissioner, officers, and inspectors of the office authorized to enforce the provisions of this part and local inspectors authorized to enforce the provisions of this part.

“Escalator” means a power driven, inclined, continuous stairway used for raising or lowering passengers.

“Hand dumbwaiter” means a dumbwaiter driven by manual power, serving more than two consecutive stories, whose capacity exceeds 20 pounds and whose car platform area exceeds two square feet.

“Hand elevator” means an elevator utilizing manual power to move the car.

“Hoistway” means a shaftway or an opening through a building or structure for the travel of elevators, dumbwaiters, or material lifts, extending from the pit floor to the roof or floor above.

“Manlift” means a device consisting of a power driven endless belt moving in one direction only which is provided with steps or platforms and handholds attached to it for the transportation of personnel from floor to floor.

“Moving walk” means a type of passenger-carrying device on which passengers stand or walk and in which the passenger-carrying surface remains parallel to its direction of motion and is uninterrupted.

“Office” means the office of Safety Fire Commissioner.

“Power dumbwaiter” means a dumbwaiter driven by the application of energy other than hand or gravity.

“Power freight elevator” means an elevator used primarily for carrying freight, utilizing energy other than gravity or hand to move the car and on which only the operator and the persons necessary for unloading and loading the freight are permitted to ride.

“Power passenger elevator” means an elevator used primarily to carry persons other than the operator and persons necessary for loading and unloading and utilizing energy other than gravity or hand to move the car.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

8-2-101.
Inspection and registration requirement; maintenance; alterations.

All elevators, escalators, manlifts, moving walks, and dumbwaiters erected or placed in service after January 1, 1986, shall be inspected before being placed in service and shall be registered within 15 days after they are completed and placed in service.

Every elevator, dumbwaiter, manlift, moving walk, and escalator shall be maintained by the owner or lessee in a safe operating condition and in conformity with the rules and regulations specified by subsection (b) of Code Section 8-2-104.

Before any alteration can be made to any elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or dumbwaiter already placed in service, the owner or lessee shall be required to notify the enforcement authority of any such alteration. The enforcement authority shall be authorized to conduct an inspection after any such alteration.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

8-2-102.
Inspections.

Power passenger elevators, power freight elevators, escalators, manlifts, and moving walks shall be inspected once during each 12 month period; provided, however, that the inspection of such equipment where found within facilities governed by Article 2 of Chapter 9 of Title 32 shall occur once during each six-month period.

Hand elevators and power and hand dumbwaiters shall be inspected once during each 12 month period.

Inspections and installations shall be made in accordance with the standards set forth in Part “X” of ANSI A17.1-1984, the American National Standard Practice for Inspection of Elevators, Escalators and Moving Walks Inspector’s Manual ANSI A17.2, the Safety Standards for Manlifts ANSI A90.1-1976, the Safety Standard for Construction Hoists ANSI A10.4-1981 and ANSI A10.5-1981, the Safety Standard for Conveyors and Related Equipment ANSI B20.1-1984, or the latest revised rules and regulations adopted by the Commissioner. Any inspections performed under these codes shall cover the hoistway, associated equipment rooms, and access thereto, and shall include lobby smoke detectors.

A report of any inspection required by this Code section shall be filed with the office if the inspection is made by a state enforcement authority or with the local governing authority if the inspection is made by a local enforcement authority. Copies of the reports for new installations shall also be filed with the state fire marshal for his or her information. Such reports shall be made within ten days after the inspection has been completed, on forms prescribed by the Commissioner or the local enforcement authority, and shall indicate whether the elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or dumbwaiter is safe and whether it meets the applicable rules and regulations prescribed pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 8-2-104. After any such report is filed, the enforcement authority may require additional inspections to assure that any such elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or dumbwaiter meets such rules and regulations.

If any inspection report indicates that an elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or dumbwaiter is in an unsafe condition which if continually operated may endanger lives or property, then the enforcement authority may, at its discretion, require the owner or lessee to discontinue the use thereof until it has been made safe and in conformity with the rules and regulations specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 8-2-104.

Elevator contractors who perform installations, alterations, repairs, or modifications on elevators, escalators, power freight elevators, moving walks, manlifts, or dumbwaiters, including the hoistways and machine rooms, shall be exempt from the requirements of Code Sections 43-14-8 and 43-14-8.1.

Private residence elevators shall be exempt from mandatory periodic inspections but shall be required to have an initial construction inspection as provided in the rules and regulations of the Commissioner. At the request of the owner or user of a private residence elevator, an inspection may be performed by the office and an inspection report issued. The office shall charge the person requesting the report a fee as set by the Commissioner to cover actual expenses of the inspection.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-102

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1470, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 8; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446; Ga. L. 2020, p. 138, § 2/SB 377.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, substituted “12 month period; provided, however, that the inspection of such equipment where found within facilities governed by Article 2 of Chapter 9 of Title 32 shall occur once during each six-month period” for “six-month period” at the end of paragraph (a)(1).

8-2-103.
Operating permits.

An operating report shall be issued by the enforcement authority if the inspection report indicates that the elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or dumbwaiter complies with the applicable rules and regulations prescribed pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 8-2-104 and upon payment of a permit fee. Such permits shall be valid for a period of 12 months.

No elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or dumbwaiter shall be operated by the owner or lessee thereof unless a valid operating permit, or a limited operating permit when permitted by the rules and regulations of the Commissioner, has been issued.

The operating permit shall indicate whether it is issued for an elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or dumbwaiter, state the rated load and speed and, in the case of an elevator, state whether the usage is for passengers or freight. The operating permit shall be posted either conspicuously in the car of an elevator or on the premises. The operating permit for an escalator, manlift, moving walk, or a dumbwaiter shall be posted on the premises.

If the enforcement authority has reason to believe that any owner or lessee to whom an operating permit has been issued is not complying with the applicable rules and regulations specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 8-2-104, it shall so notify such owner or lessee and shall give notice of a date for a hearing thereon to such owner or lessee. If, after such hearing, it shall find that such owner or lessee is not complying with such rules and regulations, it shall revoke such permit and require the owner or lessee to discontinue the use of such elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or power dumbwaiter.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-103

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1470, § 2; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

8-2-104.
Employment of inspectors; inspection fees; inspection rules and regulations.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to employ inspectors to carry out the provisions of this part. The Commissioner shall also be authorized to certify other qualified persons to carry out the provisions of this part, including technically competent individuals of any company licensed to insure and insuring elevators in this state and technically competent individuals of a regularly established elevator inspection service. The Commissioner shall prescribe the qualifications, authority, functions, and duties of such inspectors.

The Commissioner shall by rules and regulations prescribe various inspection fees and operating permit fees necessary to enable the state and local enforcement authorities to carry out the provisions of this part.

The owners and users of elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, manlifts, and moving walks which are inspected by certified inspectors in private business or with private corporations shall be exempt from the payment to the state or local enforcement authorities of the inspection fees provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

Elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, manlifts, and moving walks subject to operating permit inspections by private inspectors shall be inspected within 60 calendar days following the required reinspection date. Inspections not performed within this 60 calendar day period shall result in a civil penalty of $500.00 for each elevator, dumbwaiter, escalator, manlift, or moving walk not inspected.

Inspection fees due on elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, manlifts, and moving walks subject to inspection by the chief or deputy inspectors or operating permit fees due from inspections performed by private inspectors shall be paid within 60 calendar days of completion of such inspections. Inspection fees or operating fees unpaid within 60 calendar days shall bear interest at the rate of 1.5 percent per month or any fraction of a month. Interest shall continue to accrue until all amounts due, including interest, are received by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may waive the collection of the penalties and interest assessed in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection when it is reasonably determined that the delays in inspection or payment were unavoidable or due to the action or inaction of the office.

The American National Standard Safety Code for elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, and moving walks ANSI A17.1-1984 and the Safety Standards for Manlifts ANSI A90.1-1976 are adopted as rules and regulations of the office for the purposes of this part until otherwise amended by rules and regulations of the Commissioner.

In addition to the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, the Commissioner shall be authorized to adopt such rules and regulations as may be reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this part.

The Commissioner shall also have the power in any particular case to grant exceptions and variations from the literal requirements of the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section. Such exceptions and variations shall be granted only in any particular case where it is clearly evident that they are necessary to prevent undue hardship or where the existing conditions prevent compliance with the literal requirements of the rules and regulations. In no case shall any exception or variation be granted unless, in the opinion of the Commissioner, reasonable safety will be secured thereby.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-104

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 221, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1470, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 258, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 8; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 8; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “subparagraph (A) of this paragraph” was substituted for “subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1)” near the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(B), and “Commissioner” was substituted for “Commission” at the beginning of paragraph (b)(4).

8-2-105.
Local government regulation and enforcement.

The governing body of any municipality or county which adopts at least the minimum rules and regulations relative to inspections and safety standards for elevators, escalators, manlifts, moving walks, and dumbwaiters as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 8-2-102 and subsection (c) of Code Section 8-2-104 shall have the power:

To adopt by ordinance or resolution any reasonable provisions for the enforcement of such local standards adopted applicable to elevators, escalators, manlifts, moving walks, and dumbwaiters, including procedural requirements, provisions for hearings, provisions for appeals from decisions of local inspectors, and any other provisions or procedures necessary to the proper administration and enforcement of the requirements of such local standards;

To provide for inspection of buildings or similar structures to ensure compliance with the local standards;

To employ inspectors, including chief and deputy inspectors, and any other personnel necessary for the proper enforcement of such standards, provided that such inspectors meet the minimum qualifications of state inspectors and are certified by the Commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 8-2-104;

To contract with other municipalities or counties adopting at least state minimum standards, or with the state, to administer such standards and to provide inspection and enforcement personnel and services necessary to ensure compliance with the standards; and

To contract with any other county or municipality whereby the parties agree that the inspectors of each contracting party may have jurisdiction to enforce the local standards within the boundaries of the other contracting party.

When a local enforcement authority conducts an inspection or issues an operating permit as provided in this part, any inspection fee or operating permit fee due shall be paid to the municipality or county employing the enforcement authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-105

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

8-2-106.
Reporting of accidents; removal from service of equipment involved in accident.

The owner or lessee shall report, by telephone, to the enforcement authority on the same day or by noon on the next work day, excluding state holidays and weekends, all elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or power dumbwaiter related accidents involving personal injury or death. The owner or lessee shall also provide a written report of this accident within seven days.

The owner or lessee shall report, in writing, to the enforcement authority within seven days, excluding state holidays and weekends, all elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or power dumbwaiter related accidents involving structural damage to the elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or power dumbwaiter.

Any elevator, escalator, manlift, moving walk, or power dumbwaiter involved in an accident described in subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be removed from service at the time of the accident. The equipment shall not be repaired, altered, or placed back in service until inspected by a certified inspector for the enforcement authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-106

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1470, § 4; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

Law reviews.

For note, “Now You See It, Now You Don’t: A Georgia Perspective on Spoliation of Evidence,” see 17 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1163 (2001).

For annual survey of tort laws, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 237 (2015).

8-2-107.
Penalties.

The installation, alteration, maintenance, and operation of the facilities and equipment regulated by or pursuant to the provisions of this part affect the public interest, and such regulation is necessary for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare. Therefore, violations of this part or of rules and regulations adopted by or pursuant to this part are a public nuisance, harmful to the public health, safety, and welfare; and, in addition to other remedies provided by law, the actions of the Commissioner, the office, or any local enforcement authority under this part shall be enforceable by injunction properly applied for by the Commissioner or any other enforcement authority in any court of Georgia having jurisdiction over the defendant.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation which violates this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day on which a violation occurs shall constitute a separate offense.

In addition to the penalty provisions in subsection (a) of this Code section and paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Commissioner shall have the power, after notice and hearing, to levy civil penalties as prescribed in the rules and regulations of the office in an amount not to exceed $5,000.00 upon any person, firm, partnership, or corporation failing to adhere to the requirements of this part and the rules and regulations promulgated under this part. The imposition of a penalty for a violation of this part or the rules and regulations promulgated under this part shall not excuse the violation or permit it to continue.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-107

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 370, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

8-2-108.
Appeals from orders or acts of inspectors.

Any person aggrieved by an order or an act of an inspector under this chapter may, within 15 days of notice thereof, appeal from such order or act to the Commissioner who shall, within 30 days thereafter, issue an appropriate order either approving or disapproving said order or act. A copy of such order by the Commissioner shall be given to all interested parties.

This part, as it applies to the Commissioner and the office, shall be governed by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-108

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

8-2-109.
Consultations; creation of committees of consultants.

The Commissioner shall be authorized to consult with persons knowledgeable in the areas of construction, use, or safety of conveyances or facilities covered by this part and to create committees composed of such consultants to assist the Commissioner in carrying out his or her duties under this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-109

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 221, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 443, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

8-2-109.1.
Exceptions from part; audit of compliance of local governmental units.

This part shall not apply to elevators located on vehicles operating under the rules of other state or federal authorities and used for carrying passengers or freight.

This part shall not apply to any single-seat, single-passenger chairlift located in a building owned and operated by an incorporated or unincorporated nonprofit organization organized and operated exclusively for educational, religious, charitable, or other eleemosynary purposes.

Any county, municipality, or other political subdivision which adopts the minimum rules and regulations as provided in Code Section 8-2-105 shall be audited on a semiannual basis for compliance by the office; and any laws, ordinances, or resolutions in conflict with this part shall be void and of no effect.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-110

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1244, § 1; Code 1981, §

8-2-109.1

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 8; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1470, § 5; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1046, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1144, § 8/SB 446.

Editor’s notes.

Owing to the duplication of Code section numbers with the currently existing Code Section 8-2-110, this Code section was redesignated as Code Section 8-2-109.1 by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 8.